Florida, session 2026, SB222.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âSection 627.42398, Florida Statutes, is created 13 to read: 14 627.42398âCost-sharing requirement for diabetes 15 management.â 16 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 17 (a)ââCost-sharing requirementâ means an insuredâs 18 deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or similar out-of-pocket 19 expense. 20 (b)ââDiabetes deviceâ means a device, including, but not 21 limited to, a blood glucose test strip, a glucometer, a 22 continuous glucometer, a lancet, a lancing device, or an insulin 23 syringe, used to cure, diagnose, mitigate, prevent, or treat 24 diabetes or low blood sugar. 25 (c)ââDiabetic ketoacidosis deviceâ means a device used to 26 screen for or prevent diabetic ketoacidosis. 27 (2)âA health insurance policy may not impose a cost-sharing 28 requirement that: 29 (a)âExceeds $35 for a 30-day supply of insulin for any 30 insured, regardless of the quantity or type of insulin 31 prescribed. 32 (b)âExceeds $100 for a 30-day supply of any diabetes device 33 or diabetic ketoacidosis device. 34 (3)âThis section applies to all health insurance policies 35 delivered, issued, renewed, or amended on or after January 1, 36 2027, for delivery to persons in this state, including policies 37 provided by group, blanket, or franchise health insurers; 38 prepaid limited health service organizations and discount plan 39 organizations; and health maintenance organizations. 40 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.